Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.515

Unlawful commercial use of instrument or device—Penalty.

A person who owns or uses a weighing or measuring instrument or device and uses or permits the use of the instrument for commercial purposes in violation of RCW 19.94.015 is subject to a civil penalty of one hundred dollars for each such instrument or device used or permitted to be used in violation of RCW 19.94.015.

[ 2019 c 96 s 18; 1995 c 355 s 22.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 96: See note following RCW 19.94.160.

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.